Maine, session 132, LD5.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §4303-F, sub-§1, ¶E, as amended by PL 2023, c. 591, §3, is
further amended to read:
E. A carrier may not require a ground ambulance service provider to obtain prior
authorization before transporting an enrollee to a hospital, between hospitals or from a
hospital to a nursing home, hospice care facility or other health care facility, as defined
in Title 22, section 328, subsection 8. A carrier may not require an air ambulance
service provider that is a nonprofit organization to obtain prior authorization before
transporting an enrollee to a hospital or between hospitals for urgent care.
Sec. 2. Retroactivity. This Act applies retroactively to August 9, 2024.
Page 1 - 132LR0016(04)

Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR0016(04)